Indiana, session 2026, HB1279.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 27-1-53 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]:
Chapter 53. Collection of Cost Sharing for Health Care Services
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "administrator" means a person
who, directly or indirectly and on behalf of an insurer:
(1) underwrites; or
(2) collects charges or premiums from or adjusts or settles
claims on residents of Indiana;
in connection with health insurance coverage offered or provided
by an insurer.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "cost sharing" means any
copayment, coinsurance, deductible, or other similar charge that
is:
(1) required of a covered individual for a health care service
covered by a policy of health insurance coverage, including a
prescription drug; and
2026 IN 1279—LS 6825/DI 141


(2) paid:
(A) by; or
(B) on behalf of;
the covered individual.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "covered individual" means an
individual who is entitled to health insurance coverage under a
policy or contract.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "health care provider" means an
individual or entity that is licensed, certified, or otherwise
authorized to administer health care services under Indiana law.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "health care service" means a
service or good furnished for the purpose of preventing,
alleviating, curing, or healing:
(1) human illness;
(2) physical disability; or
(3) injury.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "health insurance coverage"
means:
(1) an individual or group policy of accident and sickness
insurance (as defined in IC 27-8-5-1);
(2) an individual contract (as defined in IC 27-13-1-21) or a
group contract (as defined in IC 27-13-1-16) that provides
coverage for basic health care services (as defined in
IC 27-13-1-4);
(3) a self-funded health benefit plan that complies with the
federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act (ERISA)
of 1974 (29 U.S.C. 1001 et seq.); and
(4) the Medicaid risk based managed care program under
IC 12-15.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "insurer" means an insurer that
provides health insurance coverage to a covered individual. The
term includes:
(1) an administrator; or
(2) a pharmacy benefit manager (as defined in
IC 27-1-24.5-12);
of a policy or contract of health insurance coverage.
Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "person" means a natural
person, corporation, mutual company, unincorporated association,
partnership, joint venture, limited liability company, trust, estate,
foundation, not-for-profit corporation, unincorporated
organization, government, or governmental subdivision or agency.
Sec. 9. (a) An insurer shall:
2026 IN 1279—LS 6825/DI 141


(1) pay a health care provider the full amount due for health
care services under the health care provider's agreement with
the insurer, including any cost sharing;
(2) have the sole responsibility for collecting cost sharing from
a covered individual; and
(3) upon request of the covered individual, collect cost sharing
throughout the policy year in increments defined by the
insurer.
(b) An insurer may not:
(1) withhold an amount for cost sharing from the payment to
a health care provider;
(2) require a health care provider to offer additional discounts
to a covered individual outside the terms of the health care
provider's agreement with the insurer;
(3) deny or delay payment to a health care provider for the
insurer's failure to collect the covered individual's cost
sharing; or
(4) require a person to collect the covered individual's cost
sharing on behalf of the insurer.
(c) An insurer may not cancel the health insurance coverage of
a covered individual solely for failure to collect cost sharing.
(d) An expense incurred by an insurer to implement or comply
with this chapter may not be used as justification to increase
premiums or decrease payments to a health care provider.
Sec. 10. Before December 31 of each year, each insurer shall
certify to the commissioner that the insurer has fully and
completely complied with the requirements of this chapter during
the previous calendar year. The certification must be signed by the
chief executive officer or chief financial officer of the insurer.
2026 IN 1279—LS 6825/DI 141